Maryland, session 2025, HB0109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–104.
(g) (2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, a person
convicted of theft of property or services with a value of at least $100 but less than $1,500,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(i) is subject to:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0109*

HOUSE BILL 109
1. for a first conviction, imprisonment not exceeding 6
months or a fine not exceeding $500 or both; and
2. for a second or subsequent conviction, imprisonment not
exceeding 1 year or a fine not exceeding $500 or both; and
(ii) shall restore the property taken to the owner or pay the owner
the value of the property or services.
(3) A person convicted of theft of property or services with a value of less
than $100 is guilty of a misdemeanor and:
(i) is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 90 days or a fine not
exceeding $500 or both; and
(ii) shall restore the property taken to the owner or pay the owner
the value of the property or services.
(i) (1) An action or prosecution for a violation of subsection (g)(2) [or (3)] of
this section shall be commenced within [2] 3 years after the commission of the crime.
(2) AN ACTION OR PROSECUTION FOR A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION
(G)(3) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE COMMENCED WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER THE
COMMISSION OF THE CRIME.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.